Maine, session 132, LD1354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §707, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1993, c. 730, §30, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §707, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Exclusivity prohibited in licensee agreements. An agreement between a licensee
and a manufacturer, distributor, brand and another qualifying entity that involves monetary
exchanges is prohibited from including provisions that would grant the manufacturer,
distributor, brand or other qualifying entity the exclusive right to supply goods or services
to the licensee. The bureau shall modify existing rules to reflect the changes in this
subsection.
This subsection does not prevent an affiliate of a licensee from receiving money for
sponsorship of a transportation system for transporting the public or for sponsorship of
specific sporting events and cultural events as long as the licensee does not receive any
payment or thing of value from the public transportation system or the sporting and cultural
events and as long as an affiliate does not derive any portions of its revenues from the
licensee. All sponsorships must have prior written approval of the bureau. The bureau
shall adopt rules implementing this paragraph.
Sec. 3. 28-A MRSA §1074, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A,
§103, is amended to read:
§1074. Outdoor stadiums
1. Issuance of licenses. The bureau may issue a license under this section for the
sale of malt liquor, wine and spirits for on-premises consumption to an outdoor stadium, as
defined in section 2, subsection 15, paragraph M. A concessionaire or lessee may be issued
a license under this section, regardless of whether it controls the premises, as long as that
concessionaire or lessee complies with the notice provisions applicable to qualified catering
services in section 1076, subsection 7 prior to exercising the license.
2. No sales at events for children. A licensee under this section may not sell malt
liquor, wine or spirits at an outdoor stadium at any event primarily involving primary or
secondary schoolchildren.
3. Conditions on sales. A licensee under this section may not sell malt liquor, wine
or spirits in the spectator stands at an outdoor stadium. A licensee may sell malt liquor,
wine or spirits only by the glass in plastic or paper cups.
4. Bottle service of spirits; designated areas. An outdoor stadium licensee may sell
spirits in original containers for service in an outdoor stadium club suite under the following
conditions:
A. Spirits must be consumed in the club suite and must be provided exclusively by the
outdoor stadium licensee;
B. Spirits provided for consumption in the club suite must remain in the club suite for
the duration of the event for which they were provided;
C. The number of containers of spirits provided for consumption in the club suite may
not exceed 6; and
Page 1 - 132LR1499(01)

D. The registered tenant of the club suite or the person specifically granted access to
the club suite by the operator of the outdoor stadium must sign a contract with the
outdoor stadium agreeing that a person under 21 years of age may not be provided with
or served liquor in the club suite.
For purposes of this subsection, "club suite" means a designated area within an outdoor
stadium designated to provide premium viewing of an event in the outdoor stadium and to
which access is limited to registered tenants and persons who have been specifically
granted access by the operator of the outdoor stadium and those persons' invited guests. A
club suite is not accessible to the public or outdoor stadium patrons with a ticket that
provides for general admission to that event at the outdoor stadium. A club suite must have
a clearly designated point of access for registered tenants and persons specifically granted
access by the operator of the outdoor stadium to ensure that persons present in the club
suite are limited to invited guests and employees providing services to the club suite.
Sec. 4. 28-A MRSA §1355-A, sub-§2-B, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 665,
§11, is further amended to read:
B. The licensee is in violation of section 707, subsection 2, 3‑A or 5‑A, if the violation
existed in the same manner at the time the license was initially issued or at the time the
license was renewed.